Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Capital Projects in Area Development Districts

42.345.
Definitions for KRS 42.350 to 42.370.

As used in KRS

42.350

to

42.370

the words:

“Beneficiary agency” means an agency eligible to receive the benefit of a capital project to be wholly or partly financed out of the area development fund, including and limited to political subdivisions, special districts and agencies created pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, or any combination thereof; and, not-for-profit corporations organized for public purposes and performing governmental functions and services;

“Fund” means the area development fund established in the State Treasury by KRS

42.350

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 187, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

Compiler's Notes.

The Interlocal Cooperation Act referred to in subdivision (1) of this section is compiled as KRS

65.210

to

65.300

.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 12, (1) at 1642.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Even though a beneficiary agency is a public corporation in terms of the nature of its governmental purpose, there is no express statutory provision making bidding procedure mandatory where it is formed pursuant to KRS Chapter 273.

OAG 79-577

.

Where the acquisition of property was legal at the time of acquisition, the fact that it was acquired without bidding does not bar the corporation from subsequently obtaining the assistance of either the coal severance economic aid fund or the area development fund in retiring preexisting debts.

OAG 79-577

.

42.350.
Area development fund for capital projects.

The area development fund in the State Treasury shall be administered by the Department for Local Government. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the commissioner of the Department for Local Government. Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the fund shall be invested in United States government securities maturing not later than one (1) year from the date of investment, and the income from the investments shall be prorated for expenditure for capital projects in area development districts according to the formula provided in KRS

42.370

.

Money in the fund shall be used only for capital projects which contribute to community or industrial development in the Commonwealth, KRS

48.300

and

48.500

notwithstanding. Capital projects eligible for financing out of the fund include and shall be limited to:

The construction, reconstruction, renovation, and maintenance of buildings and other improvements to real estate;

The acquisition of real property and interests in real property;

The purchase of major items of equipment;

Industrial site development projects, including land reclamation, clearing, grading, draining, landscaping, and the construction of walkways and fences;

The extension and installation of water, gas, sewer, and electrical utilities lines to public facilities and industrial sites;

The provision of solid waste management or disposal systems bringing counties into compliance with state or federal law. All expenses incurred in connection with or incidental to the construction or acquisition of a capital project under this section, including architectural, engineering, legal, and other expenses required for the projects may be paid out of the fund. Money in the fund may be used to retire a mortgage or other indebtedness encumbering an eligible capital project made within the preceding five (5) calendar years to secure the repayment of moneys loaned or advanced to finance the construction or acquisition of the project and may be used in match or in combination with funds obtained from other sources for an eligible capital project. No money shall be expended out of the fund, directly or indirectly, to pay or reimburse the cost of any feasibility study, master plan for any capital improvement development or redevelopment project, the purchase of consumable supplies or any administrative salary, or other operating or capital expense of any area development district or for the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, renovation, or maintenance of any building or property of schools, state institutions of higher learning, or any road, street, bridge, or highway.

The board of directors of each area development district shall determine from among the capital project proposals submitted by eligible beneficiary agencies, the capital projects to be proposed to be constructed or acquired out of the fund. The area development districts shall submit to the commissioner of the Department for Local Government the capital projects selected for construction or acquisition within the districts. Each project proposal shall include: a detailed description of the project; a statement of the public benefit to be derived from the project; if available, design plans and specifications for the project; an itemized estimate of the cost of the project; a statement of the sources and amounts of funds available from any other source for the construction or acquisition of the project; and other information relating to the proposed capital project as the Department for Local Government may require.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 339, § 1; 1978, ch. 187, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 35, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 404, § 42, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 69, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 15, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 21, effective July 15, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 12, (1) at 1642.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 12, (2) at 1642.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The restriction against encumbrances applies to private business enterprises acquiring industrial development properties for completion of an industrial development purpose.

OAG 77-51

.

Engineering and architectural design costs for a capital project, as a condition for consideration of a construction grant by a federal agency, are eligible for payment from the economic aid fund or the area development fund, regardless of whether the capital project is completed or not.

OAG 77-565

.

Since a landing or wharf constructed on city property would be a legitimate municipal improvement, a fourth-class city could use area development funds to construct a ferry boat landing on city-owned property.

OAG 77-651

.

Although this section prohibits the encumbrance of a capital improvement project, the use of area development funds for the renovation of a county courthouse would not be in conflict with the statute.

OAG 77-714

.

Land leased from a county board of education for a term of 50 years and used by the fiscal court in the construction of a recreational complex does not constitute “school property” within the prohibition contained in this section.

OAG 77-750

.

While the board of an area development district may exercise its sound and reasonable discretion in establishing criteria leading to making the selections of projects to be submitted to the Secretary of the Finance Department (now Finance and Administration Cabinet), a criterion providing that the applicant must have made a monetary contribution to the area development district organization does not represent a rational connection between the legislative purpose and the scheme of criteria and is arbitrary in violation of Ky. Const., § 2.

OAG 79-181

.

Although KRS

424.260

is not mentioned in KRS

42.345

et seq., implicit in such statutes is the concept that a mandatory law applicable to procuring of personal property must be complied with.

OAG 79-371

.

The phrase “road, street, bridge or highway” logically includes any road department equipment, such as a truck, to be used by that department.

OAG 85-75

.

Even though subdivision (2)(c) of this section provides for the use of the area development fund for “the purchase of major items of equipment,” such equipment can only be considered in connection with equipment of an eligible “capital project.”

OAG 85-75

.

Under the clear and unambiguous wording of subdivision (2)(f) of this section, the Area Development Fund money granted to counties cannot legally be expended by a fiscal court for county road department equipment or for county roads and bridges.

OAG 85-75

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Whiteside and Gillig, Coal and Conservation — Tax Policy,
64 Ky. L.J. 573 (1975-76).

42.355.
Examination and approval of projects — Grants — Administration — Conditions.

The Department for Local Government shall examine each capital project selected by the area development districts, and when it finds that a proposed project conforms to the requirements of KRS

42.350

to

42.370

; that the estimated costs of the project are reasonable; that the costs proposed to be paid from the fund are within the amount available; and that the proposed beneficiary agency will be reasonably able to finance the operation and maintain the capital project during its estimated useful life, the commissioner of the Department for Local Government shall approve it. If the Department for Local Government determines that a capital project proposal does not conform to the requirements of KRS

42.350

to

42.370

, that the estimated costs of the project are excessive or unreasonable in light of the public benefit to be derived from the project, or the unencumbered balance in the fund available for expenditure in the area development district is insufficient to pay the costs of the project, or the part thereof proposed to be paid out of the fund, or the beneficiary agency cannot reasonably finance the operation of or maintain the capital project during its estimated useful life, the project proposal shall be disapproved by the Department for Local Government. The final decision to either approve or disapprove any project proposal shall be made no later than forty-five (45) days following official submittal of a complete proposal by the area development district, and the area development district shall be accordingly notified at that time.

The commissioner of the Department for Local Government may make direct grants-in-aid of money out of the fund to any beneficiary agency for the construction or acquisition of any approved capital project. When a direct grant-in-aid has been made to a beneficiary agency, all contracts awarded for the purchase of materials, supplies, equipment, or services, except professional and technical services, required for the construction or acquisition of the project shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder in the discretion of the beneficiary agency after public advertisement as required by KRS Chapter 424 or other applicable law. All contracts awarded under this section for the construction, reconstruction, or renovation of a building or other improvement to real estate shall be deemed contracts for public works within the meaning of KRS

341.317

and KRS Chapter 376 and other applicable statutes. All beneficiary agencies receiving a direct grant-in-aid under this subsection shall keep and maintain complete and accurate records of accounts of all expenditures of the grant moneys which shall be subject to audit by the Commonwealth for a period of five (5) years after completion of the capital project. Beneficiary agencies shall complete approved capital projects within a reasonable period of time as determined by the Department for Local Government. Upon completion of capital projects, beneficiary agencies shall submit project completion reports to the Department for Local Government as prescribed by the Department for Local Government and containing documents and information as may be necessary to determine compliance with KRS

42.350

to

42.360

and other applicable statutes and administrative regulations. Beneficiary agencies shall be liable to repay to the fund any granted funds for failure to submit full project completion reports within a reasonable period of time or for expenditure of granted funds in violation of statutes and regulations. No additional area development funds may be approved until compliance, except at the discretion of the commissioner of the Department for Local Government. Any grant moneys not required after all of the costs of the capital project have been paid by the beneficiary agency shall be promptly returned to the Commonwealth for reallocation for expenditure for other capital projects in the area development district to which the funds had been originally allocated.

No capital project shall be constructed under KRS

42.350

to

42.370

except upon land to which (a) the Commonwealth, a political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or the beneficiary agency of the capital project has a good and marketable title, free of encumbrances, or (b) the beneficiary agency of the project has the right to the uninterrupted use, occupancy, and possession for a period longer than the estimated useful life of the capital project; provided nothing herein shall prohibit the construction or renovation of public buildings on land with an existing encumbrance to secure payment of funds obtained for the acquisition or improvement of said land. Each beneficiary agency shall execute and deliver to the Commonwealth its written assurances, which shall be binding on the agencies’ successors and assigns, guaranteeing that during its estimated useful life, the capital project shall be operated and maintained for public purposes and pledging that no mortgage or other encumbrances shall be placed against any capital project wholly financed out of the fund, except industrial development projects, for the breach of which assurances the Commonwealth shall have right of entry to the capital project and the beneficiary agency, or its successors and assigns, shall forthwith convey the title to the capital project to the Commonwealth. Similar assurances shall be executed and delivered to the Commonwealth by the beneficiary agencies of capital projects financed in part out of the fund and in part from other sources, except that when additional funding is derived from the issuance and sale of revenue bonds or under other statutorily authorized financing methods, to secure the repayment of which funds a statutory mortgage lien is granted in favor of any person or group of persons, the capital project may be encumbered to the extent authorized or required by the law under which the financing method was undertaken; nor shall anything in this section prohibit the encumbrance of any real property located within an industrial park or constituting an industrial site, developed or improved as a capital project under KRS

42.350

and this section, by any person, firm, company, partnership, or corporation to which the property has been conveyed, to obtain financing for the construction upon the property of industrial and commercial buildings. The written assurances provided by beneficiary agencies under this section shall be lodged for recording and recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the proposed project shall be located.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 187, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 404, § 43, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 69, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 16, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 22, effective July 15, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 12, (1) at 1642.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Department of Local Government could not approve an expenditure for purchase of two ambulances by a county where the department was unable to certify that the proposed project was an eligible capital project because the purchase was a void transaction since the provisions of KRS

424.260

were not followed.

OAG 79-371

.

Subsection (4) of this section, in mentioning the bidding law of KRS Chapter 424, specifically adopts KRS

424.260

to the extent that such latter statute requires formal bidding.

OAG 84-57

.

42.360.
Rules and regulations for implementation of KRS 42.350 and 42.355.

The commissioner of the Department for Local Government shall promulgate rules and regulations governing submission and approval of proposed capital projects, the expenditure of moneys from the fund, and the designation of beneficiary agencies involved in capital projects as shall be appropriate to the implementation of KRS

42.350

and

42.355

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 339, § 3; 1978, ch. 187, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 404, § 44, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 69, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 17, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 23, effective July 15, 2010.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 12, (1) at 1642.

42.370.
Amounts to be expended from fund.

The maximum amount to be expended out of the area development fund for capital projects within each area development district shall be calculated on the basis of the following formula:

Sixty percent (60%) of the fund is allocated for expenditure within each district in the ratio that the population of the component counties bears to the total population of the state.

Twenty percent (20%) of the fund is allocated for expenditure in each district in inverse proportion to the total manufacturing employment conducted in each such district.

Twenty percent (20%) of the fund is allocated for expenditure in each district in inverse proportion to the relative per capita income prevailing in each such district.

Any balance remaining in the fund at the close of any fiscal year shall not lapse, but shall continue into and be available for expenditure during the next succeeding fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 187, § 5, effective June 17, 1978.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, A, 12, (1) at 1642.